Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Subpart 1 State Election Board

Administrative rules and regulations.

Registration of electors, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, State Election Board, Chapter 183-1-6.

Ballots, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, State Election Board, Chapter 183-1-11.

Voting machines and voting recorders, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, State Election Board, Chapter 183-1-12.

21-2-30.
Creation; composition; election of chairperson, terms of service; vacancies; quorum; seal and bylaws; meetings.

There is created a state board to be known as the State Election Board, to be composed of a chairperson elected by the General Assembly, an elector to be elected by a majority vote of the Senate of the General Assembly at its regular session held in each odd-numbered year, an elector to be elected by a majority vote of the House of Representatives of the General Assembly at its regular session held in each odd-numbered year, and a member of each political party to be nominated and appointed in the manner provided in this Code section. No person while a member of the General Assembly shall serve as a member of the board.

(a.1) (1)

The chairperson shall be elected by the General Assembly in the following manner: A joint resolution which shall fix a definite time for the nomination and election of the chairperson may be introduced in either branch of the General Assembly. Upon passage of the resolution by a majority vote of the membership of the Senate and House of Representatives, it shall be the duty of the Speaker of the House of Representatives to call for the nomination and election of the chairperson at the time specified in the resolution, at which time the name of the qualified person receiving a majority vote of the membership of the House of Representatives shall be transmitted to the Senate for confirmation. Upon the qualified person’s receiving a majority vote of the membership of the Senate, he or she shall be declared the duly elected chairperson; and the Governor shall be notified of his or her election by the Secretary of the Senate. The Governor is directed to administer the oath of office to the chairperson and to furnish the chairperson with a properly executed commission of office certifying his or her election.

A member elected by a house of the General Assembly shall take office on the day following the adjournment of the regular session in which elected and shall serve for a term of two years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified, unless sooner removed. An elected member of the board may be removed at any time by a majority vote of the house which elected him or her. In the event a vacancy should occur in the office of such a member of the board at a time when the General Assembly is not in session, then the President of the Senate shall thereupon appoint an elector to fill the vacancy if the prior incumbent of such office was elected by the Senate or appointed by the President of the Senate; and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall thereupon appoint an elector to fill the vacancy if the prior incumbent of such office was elected by the House of Representatives or appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. A member appointed to fill a vacancy may be removed at any time by a majority vote of the house whose presiding officer appointed him or her.

Within 30 days after April 3, 1968, the state executive committee of each political party shall nominate a member of its party to serve as a member of the State Election Board and, thereupon, the Governor shall appoint such nominee as a member of the board to serve for a term of two years from the date of the appointment and until his or her successor is elected and qualified, unless sooner removed. Thereafter, such state executive committee shall select a nominee for such office on the board within 30 days after a vacancy occurs in such office and shall also select a nominee at least 30 days prior to the expiration of the term of each incumbent nominated by it; and each such nominee shall be immediately appointed by the Governor as a member of the board to serve for the unexpired term in the case of a vacancy, and for a term of two years in the case of an expired term. Each successor, other than one appointed to serve an unexpired term, shall serve for a term of two years; and the terms shall run consecutively from the date of the initial gubernatorial appointment. No person shall be eligible for nomination by such state executive committee unless he or she is an elector and a member in good standing of the political party of the committee. Such a member shall cease to serve on the board and his or her office shall be abolished if and when his or her political organization shall cease to be a “political party” as defined in Code Section 21-2-2.

The Secretary of State shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the board. Three voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and no vacancy on the board shall impair the right of the quorum to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the board. The board shall adopt a seal for its use and bylaws for its own government and procedure.

Meetings shall be held whenever necessary for the performance of the duties of the board on call of the chairperson or whenever any two of its members so request. Minutes shall be kept of all meetings of the board and a record kept of the vote of each member on all questions coming before the board. The chairperson shall give to each member of the board prior notice of the time and place of each meeting of the board.

If any member of the board, other than the Secretary of State, shall qualify as a candidate for any public office which is to be voted upon in any primary or election regulated by the board, that member’s position on the board shall be immediately vacated and such vacancy shall be filled in the manner provided for filling other vacancies on the board.

(2)

The chairperson of the board shall be nonpartisan. At no time during his or her service as chairperson shall the chairperson actively participate in a political party organization or in the campaign of a candidate for public office, nor shall he or she make any campaign contributions to a candidate for public office. Furthermore, to qualify for appointment as chairperson, in the two years immediately preceding his or her appointment, a person shall not have qualified as a partisan candidate for public office, participated in a political party organization or the campaign of a partisan candidate for public office, or made any campaign contributions to a partisan candidate for public office.

(3)

The term of office of the chairperson shall continue until a successor is elected as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. In the event of a vacancy in the position of chairperson at a time when the General Assembly is not in session, it shall be the duty of the Governor and the Governor is empowered and directed to appoint a chairperson possessing the qualifications as provided in this subsection who shall serve as chairperson until the next regular session of the General Assembly, at which time the nomination and election of a chairperson shall be held by the General Assembly as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 59, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-201, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 1/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 5/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, substituted “a chairperson elected by the General Assembly” for “the Secretary of State” in the first sentence of subsection (a); added subsection (a.1); in subsection (d), substituted “an ex officio nonvoting member of the board” for “the chairperson of the board” in the first sentence, and inserted “voting” at the beginning of the second sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-31.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the State Election Board:

To promulgate rules and regulations so as to obtain uniformity in the practices and proceedings of superintendents, registrars, deputy registrars, poll officers, and other officials, as well as the legality and purity in all primaries and elections;

To formulate, adopt, and promulgate such rules and regulations, consistent with law, as will be conducive to the fair, legal, and orderly conduct of primaries and elections; and, upon the adoption of each rule and regulation, the board shall promptly file certified copies thereof with the Secretary of State and each superintendent;

To publish in print or electronically and furnish to primary and election officials, from time to time, a sufficient number of indexed copies of all primary and election laws and pertinent rules and regulations then in force;

To publish in print or electronically and distribute such explanatory pamphlets regarding the interpretation and application of primary and election laws as in the opinion of the board should be distributed to the electorate;

To investigate, or authorize the Secretary of State to investigate, when necessary or advisable the administration of primary and election laws and frauds and irregularities in primaries and elections and to report violations of the primary and election laws either to the Attorney General or the appropriate district attorney who shall be responsible for further investigation and prosecution. Nothing in this paragraph shall be so construed as to require any complaining party to request an investigation by the board before such party might proceed to seek any other remedy available to that party under this chapter or any other provision of law;

To make such recommendations to the General Assembly as it may deem advisable relative to the conduct and administration of primaries and elections;

To promulgate rules and regulations to define uniform and nondiscriminatory standards concerning what constitutes a vote and what will be counted as a vote for each category of voting system used in this state;

To employ such assistants as may be necessary;

Subject to funds being specifically appropriated by the General Assembly, to formulate and conduct a voter education program concerning voting procedures for voting by absentee ballot and at the polls with particular emphasis on the proper types of identification required for voting; and

To take such other action, consistent with law, as the board may determine to be conducive to the fair, legal, and orderly conduct of primaries and elections.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 269, § 45; Ga. L. 1959, p. 57, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 862, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1670, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 3, § 1/SB 84; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 2/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Registration of electors, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, State Election Board, Subject 183-1-6.

Returns of primaries and elections, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Election Board, Subject 183-1-15.

Rules of the State Election Board, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Subject 183-1-1 through 183-2-16.

Rules for voter registration by private entities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.02.

Tabulating center personnel, trained and certified, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.03.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 145 (2006).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

21-2-32.
Institution of and intervention in court actions; procedure; compensation of presiding judge; granting of relief; notice; appellate review.

The State Election Board shall have the right to institute or to intervene as a party in any action in any court of this state or of the United States, seeking mandamus, injunction, or other relief, to compel compliance with any election or primary law of the state or with any valid rule or regulation of the board, or to restrain or otherwise prevent or prohibit any fraudulent or other illegal conduct in connection therewith, including the right to seek such relief for any anticipatory breach.

Any petition seeking any of the relief authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be filed in the superior court of the county of residence of the superintendent charged with the conduct of the election or primary in which it is alleged that there was or will be fraud or other illegal conduct or, in the case of municipal primaries and elections, in the county in which the city hall is located.

Upon the filing of such petition, the clerk of superior court having jurisdiction shall immediately notify the administrative judge for the judicial administrative district in which the county lies, or the district court administrator, who shall immediately notify the administrative judge, of the institution of proceedings under this article. If the county in which the proceedings were instituted is not in the circuit of the administrative judge, the administrative judge shall select a superior court judge from within the district, but not from the circuit in which the proceeding was instituted, or a senior judge who is not a resident of the circuit in which the proceeding was instituted, to preside over the proceeding.

If the administrative judge is a member of the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, or if the other judges of the district are unable or are unwilling to preside over the proceeding, or if the other judges of the district are judges of the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, then the administrative judge shall select an administrative judge of an adjoining district to select a superior court judge from that district, or a superior court judge from the district in which the proceeding was filed, but not the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, or a senior judge who is not a resident of the circuit wherein the proceeding was filed. In the event any temporary order is sought, the petition may be presented to the administrative judge prior to its filing for consideration of the application for such order. If the petition upon which temporary relief is sought prior to the filing will be filed in any county of the circuit of the administrative judge, then the petition may be presented to the administrative judge of an adjoining district prior to its filing for consideration of the application for such order.

After a judge has agreed to preside over the case, the administrative judge who selected the judge to hear the matter shall enter an order in the superior court of the county where the proceeding was filed appointing such judge, and such judge shall promptly begin presiding over such proceedings in such court and shall determine same as soon as practicable. Such judge shall be reimbursed for his or her actual expenses for food and lodging and shall receive the same mileage as any other state officials and employees. Senior judges shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement as the law provides for senior judge service.

If, in the opinion of the judge presiding over such cause, adequate relief cannot otherwise be granted to assure compliance with said laws, rules, and regulations, the judge may enter such order concerning the conduct of such election or primary which he or she shall deem necessary to assure compliance, including the right to require such election or primary to be held under the supervision of the State Election Board.

Upon any action being filed in any court of this state seeking relief affecting the calling, holding, conduct, determination, result, tabulation, or certification of any election or primary, except those instituted by the State Election Board, a copy of the proceeding shall be served upon such board by mailing a copy of same to the chairperson by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery; and a certificate that such service has been made shall be filed by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney.

Any verdict, judgment, decree, order, ruling, or other judicial action in such cases shall be subject to review by the appellate court having jurisdiction thereof. It shall be the duty of the proper appellate court to consider application for stays or supersedeas in such cases without regard to whether any appeal has been filed or the record docketed in such cases.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-203, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 608, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, made this Act applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

21-2-33.
Hearings before board.

The State Election Board may examine under oath any person concerning any matter connected with or bearing on the proper discharge of its duties; and any member of the board may administer such oath. The board shall have full power to subpoena persons and papers and to compel the witnesses to answer under oath touching any questions which may properly come before the board and to take, through its agent, the depositions of witnesses. The board, in investigating the administration of primary and election laws within a county or any frauds or irregularities in primaries and elections held therein, shall conduct each hearing concerning same at a place within such county. No witness shall be compelled to attend if he or she should reside more than 100 miles from the place of hearing by the nearest practical route; provided, however, that the board may compel the taking of his or her testimony by deposition in the county of the residence of the witness. The sheriff of any county, or his or her deputy, or agent of the board shall serve all processes issued by the board; or the same may be served by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery; and the production of an appropriate return receipt issued by the post office or commercial delivery firm shall constitute prima-facie evidence of such service. In case of the refusal of any person subpoenaed to attend or testify, such facts shall be reported forthwith by the board to the appropriate superior court, or to a judge thereof, and such court or judge shall order such witness to attend and testify. On failure or refusal to obey such order, such witness shall be dealt with as for contempt. Any witness so subpoenaed, and after attending, shall be allowed and paid the same mileage and fee as now allowed and paid witnesses in civil actions in the superior court.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-204, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 20, § 1.

Cross references.

Witness fees and mileage, §

24-13-25

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, made this Act applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

21-2-33.1.
Enforcement of chapter; suspension of election superintendents; support and assistance from the Secretary of State.

The State Election Board is vested with the power to issue orders, after the completion of appropriate proceedings, directing compliance with this chapter or prohibiting the actual or threatened commission of any conduct constituting a violation, which order may include a provision requiring the violator:

To cease and desist from committing further violations;

To pay a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.00 for each violation of this chapter or for each failure to comply with any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter. Such penalty may be assessed against any violator as the State Election Board deems appropriate;

To publicly reprimand any violator found to have committed a violation;

To require that restitution be paid by any violator to a state, county, or city governing authority when it has suffered a monetary loss or damage as the result of a violation;

To require violators to attend training as specified by the board; and

To assess investigative costs incurred by the board against any violator found to have committed a violation.

A civil penalty shall not be assessed against any violator except after notice and hearing as provided by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” In addition to the State Election Board, any contested case may be held before any representative of such board who has been selected and appointed by such board for such purpose. The amount of any civil penalty finally assessed shall be recoverable by a civil action brought in the name of the State Election Board. All moneys recovered pursuant to this Code section shall be deposited in the state treasury.

The Attorney General of this state shall, upon complaint by the State Election Board, bring an action in the superior court in the name of the State Election Board for a temporary restraining order or other injunctive relief or for civil penalties assessed against any violator of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation duly issued by the State Election Board.

Any action brought by the Attorney General to enforce civil penalties assessed against any violator of this chapter or any rule or regulation duly issued by the State Election Board or any order issued by the State Election Board ordering compliance or to cease and desist from further violations shall be brought in the superior court of the county of the residence of the party against whom relief is sought. Service of process shall lie in any jurisdiction within the state. In such actions, the superior court inquiry will be limited to whether notice was given by the State Election Board to the violator in compliance with the Constitution and the rules of procedure of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” Upon satisfaction that notice was given and a hearing was held pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the superior court shall enforce the orders of the State Election Board and the civil penalties assessed under this chapter and the superior court shall not make independent inquiry as to whether the violations have occurred.

In any action brought by the Attorney General to enforce any of the provisions of this chapter or of any rule or regulation issued by the State Election Board, the judgment, if in favor of the State Election Board, shall provide that the defendant pay to the State Election Board the costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred by the State Election Board in the prosecution of such action.

After following the procedures set forth in Code Section 21-2-33.2, the State Election Board may suspend county or municipal superintendents and appoint an individual to serve as the temporary superintendent in a jurisdiction. Such individual shall exercise all the powers and duties of a superintendent as provided by law, including the authority to make all personnel decisions related to any employees of the jurisdiction who assist with carrying out the duties of the superintendent, including, but not limited to, the director of elections, the election supervisor, and all poll officers.

At no time shall the State Election Board suspend more than four county or municipal superintendents pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section.

The Secretary of State shall, upon the request of the State Election Board, provide any and all necessary support and assistance that the State Election Board, in its sole discretion, determines is necessary to enforce this chapter or to carry out or conduct any of its duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-33.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1670, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 3, 27; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 5/HB 244; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 6/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, added subsections (f) through (h).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).